Alabama, session 2026rs, HB356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. In Houston County, any duties of the judge
of probate relating to the selling or redeeming of lands for
taxes shall be transferred to and performed by the revenue
commissioner, and the judge of probate shall be relieved of
all related duties
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 1

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB356 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 05-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 25-Feb-26 Passed



Page 2